District of Columbia statutes.
31-1631.07

License denial, suspension, revocation, and refusal to renew; civil penalties.

(a)

The Commissioner may deny a license to an applicant or suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license if the applicant or licensee:

(1)

Violates the provisions of this chapter or any standard of conduct prescribed by the Commissioner in regulations;

(2)

Makes a material misstatement in the application for the license;

(3)

Engages in fraudulent or dishonest practices; or

(4)

Demonstrates incompetency or untrustworthiness to act as a public insurance adjuster.

(b)

Upon a finding by the Commissioner of a violation of subsection (a)(1) or (3) of this section, the Commissioner may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 for each violation.

(c)

This chapter shall not be applied or interpreted to bar a borrower from bringing an action pursuant to any District or federal law for damages, injunctive relief, or any other relief.

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-256, § 7, 50 DCR 238
This section is referenced in § 28-3811.